Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2681.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Joseph Kay Memorial Highway.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Joseph W. "Joey" Kay was born May 8, 1989, in Doylestown.(2) Mr. Kay was a 2007 graduate of Central Bucks East High School. Mr. Kay continued his education at Pennsylvania College of Technology while pursuing a career as an electrician.(3) Outside of work, Mr. Kay was deeply connected to the Bucks County community and was always willing to lend a helping hand to neighbors, friends and local organizations. He was an accomplished race car driver, competing in the Mid-12345678910111213141516171819 Atlantic Racing Sprint Series and at Action Track USA, where he earned the respect and admiration of fellow competitors and fans for both his talent and sportsmanship.(4) Mr. Kay's life was rooted in service to his community. Continuing a family legacy of volunteerism and public service, he proudly served with the Plumsteadville Volunteer Fire Company, where he demonstrated dedication, selflessness and a willingness to help others whenever needed. In recognition of his commitment and contributions, he was named Firefighter of the Year in 2012. Additionally, Mr. Kay worked alongside his father in the family business and served as Vice President of John W. Kay Electrical Contractors in Richboro.(5) Mr. Kay is survived by his loving wife of three years, Rachel; parents, John W. and Susan (Quigley) Kay; in-laws, Pam and Steve Salera; brother-in-law, Peter Salera; and grandfather, Jack Kay. He is also mourned by his three devoted sisters and their spouses: Shannon A. Rittenhouse, Lauren A. Etter and Megan K. McBride and eight cherished nieces and nephews: Carson, Callum and Sloane Rittenhouse; Landon, Garrett and Charlotte Etter; and Bridget and Sean McBride. He is preceded in death by his loving grandparents Arline and Donald Quigley and Elizabeth Kay.(b) Designation.--The portion of Pennsylvania Route 611 from the intersection with Old Easton Road to the intersection with Kellers Church Road in Plumstead Township, Bucks County, is designated the Joseph Kay Memorial Highway.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the highway to traffic in both directions on the highway.20260HB2681PN3736 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2681PN3736 - 3 - 12